Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1067.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 42-18115, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-18115. Easements and liens not extinguished by sale A. The sale of a real property tax lien does not extinguish any easement on or appurtenant to the property. B. The sale of a real property tax lien does not extinguish any lien for an assessment levied pursuant to title 48, chapter 4, 6 or 14,  or section 9-276 or 11-268.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 42-18115, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by section 3  1 of this act, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-18115. Easements and liens not extinguished by sale A. The sale of a real property tax lien does not extinguish any easement on or appurtenant to the property. B. The sale of a real property tax lien does not extinguish any lien for an assessment levied pursuant to title 48, chapter 4, 6 or 14 or section 9-276 or 11-268.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 42-18204, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-18204. Judgment foreclosing right to redeem; effect A. In an action to foreclose the right to redeem: 1. If the court finds that the tax lien sale is valid, the tax lien has not been redeemed and the defendant's request for an excess proceeds sale is unreasonable or the defendant did not request an excess proceeds sale, the court shall enter judgment: (a) Foreclosing the right of the defendant to redeem. (b) Directing the county treasurer to expeditiously execute and deliver to the party in whose favor judgment is entered, including the state, a deed conveying the property described in the certificate of purchase. 2. If the court finds that the tax lien sale is valid, the tax lien has not been redeemed and the defendant's request for an excess proceeds sale is reasonable, the court shall enter judgment: (a) Foreclosing the right of the defendant to redeem. (b) Directing the sale of the property pursuant to article 6 of this chapter. (c) Setting the opening bid for the property as the total of the amounts described in subsection B, paragraph 1, subdivisions (a), (b), (c) and (e) of this section and any other reasonable fees as determined by the court. B. A property owner whose right to redeem is being foreclosed may request the court to determine if the sale of the property to recover excess proceeds is reasonable. The court shall determine that the sale of the property for excess proceeds is reasonable if the sale price of the property is likely to be more than $2,500 above the total of the amounts described in paragraph 1 of this subsection. If a request is made for an excess proceeds sale, the following information shall be provided to the court for the purposes of determining if an excess proceeds sale is reasonable: 1. The certificate of purchase holder shall provide all of the following: (a) The costs related to filing the claim to foreclose the right to redeem, including estimated attorney fees and costs to be incurred through the date of the excess proceeds sale, if ordered. (b) The amount for which the real property tax lien was sold, with interest at a rate of sixteen percent per annum from the date of the tax lien sale through the date of the excess proceeds sale, if ordered. (c) The amount of any statutory fees the certificate of purchase holder paid in connection with the certificate of purchase, except the processing fee imposed by section 42-18116, subsection C, with interest at a rate of sixteen percent per annum from the date of the tax lien sale through the date of the excess proceeds sale, if ordered. (d) The amount of all other recorded state liens or encumbrances on the state property as indicated on a title report provided by the certificate of purchase holder, including other years in which taxes are delinquent. For the purposes of this subdivision, the certificate of purchase holder does not have to determine the actual balance owed on any lien or encumbrance on the property, except for property taxes owed. (e) The estimated cost of the sale of property pursuant to article 6 of this chapter. (f) Any other evidence relating to the value of the property or objecting to the excess proceeds sale that the certificate of purchase holder deems necessary. 2. The property owner whose right to redeem is being foreclosed shall provide a reasonable estimate of the market value of the property. C. After entering judgment the parties whose rights to redeem the tax lien are thereby foreclosed have no further legal or equitable right, title or interest in the property subject to the right of appeal and stay of execution as in other civil actions. D. The foreclosure of the right to redeem does not extinguish any of the following: 1. An easement on or appurtenant to the property. 2. A lien for an assessment levied pursuant to title 48, chapter 4, 6, 14 or 18 or section 9-276 or 11-268. For the purposes of this paragraph, assessment does not include an abatement lien imposed under section 9-499. 3. If the court finds that the request for an excess proceeds sale is reasonable, the property owner's interest in the excess proceeds from the sale of the property pursuant to article 6 of this chapter. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 42-18204, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by section 3 of this act, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-18204. Judgment foreclosing right to redeem; effect A. In an action to foreclose the right to redeem: 1. If the court finds that the tax lien sale is valid, the tax lien has not been redeemed and the defendant's request for an excess proceeds sale is unreasonable or the defendant did not request an excess proceeds sale, the court shall enter judgment: (a) Foreclosing the right of the defendant to redeem. (b) Directing the county treasurer to expeditiously execute and deliver to the party in whose favor judgment is entered, including the state, a deed conveying the property described in the certificate of purchase. 2. If the court finds that the tax lien sale is valid, the tax lien has not been redeemed and the defendant's request for an excess proceeds sale is reasonable, the court shall enter judgment: (a) Foreclosing the right of the defendant to redeem. (b) Directing the sale of the property pursuant to article 6 of this chapter. (c) Setting the opening bid for the property as the total of the amounts described in subsection B, paragraph 1, subdivisions (a), (b), (c) and (e) of this section and any other reasonable fees as determined by the court. B. A property owner whose right to redeem is being foreclosed may request the court to determine if the sale of the property to recover excess proceeds is reasonable. The court shall determine that the sale of the property for excess proceeds is reasonable if the sale price of the property is likely to be more than $2,500 above the total of the amounts described in paragraph 1 of this subsection. If a request is made for an excess proceeds sale, the following information shall be provided to the court for the purposes of determining if an excess proceeds sale is reasonable: 1. The certificate of purchase holder shall provide all of the following: (a) The costs related to filing the claim to foreclose the right to redeem, including estimated attorney fees and costs to be incurred through the date of the excess proceeds sale, if ordered. (b) The amount for which the real property tax lien was sold, with interest at a rate of sixteen percent per annum from the date of the tax lien sale through the date of the excess proceeds sale, if ordered. (c) The amount of any statutory fees the certificate of purchase holder paid in connection with the certificate of purchase, except the processing fee imposed by section 42-18116, subsection C, with interest at a rate of sixteen percent per annum from the date of the tax lien sale through the date of the excess proceeds sale, if ordered. (d) The amount of all other recorded state liens or encumbrances on the state property as indicated on a title report provided by the certificate of purchase holder, including other years in which taxes are delinquent. For the purposes of this subdivision, the certificate of purchase holder does not have to determine the actual balance owed on any lien or encumbrance on the property, except for property taxes owed. (e) The estimated cost of the sale of property pursuant to article 6 of this chapter. (f) Any other evidence relating to the value of the property or objecting to the excess proceeds sale that the certificate of purchase holder deems necessary. 2. The property owner whose right to redeem is being foreclosed shall provide a reasonable estimate of the market value of the property. C. After entering judgment the parties whose rights to redeem the tax lien are thereby foreclosed have no further legal or equitable right, title or interest in the property subject to the right of appeal and stay of execution as in other civil actions. D. The foreclosure of the right to redeem does not extinguish any of the following: 1. An easement on or appurtenant to the property. 2. A lien for an assessment levied pursuant to title 48, chapter 4, 6, 14 or 18 or section 9-276 or 11-268. For the purposes of this paragraph, assessment does not include an abatement lien imposed under section 9-499. 3. If the court finds that the request for an excess proceeds sale is reasonable, the property owner's interest in the excess proceeds from the sale of the property pursuant to article 6 of this chapter.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Effective date Section 42-18115, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by section 2 of this act, and section 42-18204, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by section 4 of this act, are effective from and after September 30, 2028. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR MAY 29, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY 29, 2026.